Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5387.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Armed forces" means any branch of the United States Armed Forces, including the reserve components. (b) (a) "Missing senior or vulnerable adult" means a resident of this state who is 1 of the following: (i) At least 60 years of age and is believed to be incapable of returning to his or her the individual's residence without assistance and is reported missing by a person familiar with that individual. (ii) A vulnerable adult, as that term is defined in section 145m of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.145m, who is reported missing by a person familiar with that individual. (iii) A person An individual who is missing and suffering from senility or a physical or mental condition that subjects the person individual or others to personal and immediate danger. (iv) A missing veteran at risk. (c) "Missing veteran at risk" means an active-duty member or a veteran of the armed forces or Michigan National Guard who is reported missing and as having a physical or mental health condition by a person familiar with that individual. (d) (b) "Person familiar with the missing senior or vulnerable adult" means a missing senior's or vulnerable adult's guardian, custodian, or guardian ad litem or an individual who provides the missing senior or vulnerable adult with home health aid services, possesses a health care power of attorney for the missing senior or vulnerable adult, has proof that the missing senior or vulnerable adult has a medical condition, or otherwise has information regarding the missing senior or vulnerable adult.